Wisconsin, session 2025, AB410.
do enact as follows:AB410,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB410,2,24(1) Grants for statewide falls prevention awareness and initiatives. 5From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the department of health services 6shall award a grant of $450,000 in each of fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 to the 1Wisconsin Institute for Healthy Aging for the purpose of statewide falls prevention 2awareness and initiatives.AB410,23Section 2. Fiscal changes.AB410,2,104(1) Grants for statewide falls prevention awareness and initiatives. 5In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of 6health services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 7increased by $450,000 to award a grant under Section 1 (1) of this act. In the 8schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of health 9services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 10increased by $450,000 to award a grant under Section 1 (1) of this act.AB410,2,1111